language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0527 Y 147
SFX 0527 rka njerka ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaca ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkace ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaceho ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacej ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaceje ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaceju ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacemu ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkach ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkachmoj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkachmy ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkachu ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacoh ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacom ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacu ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacy ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacych ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacym ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacymaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkacymi ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaja ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkajmoj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkajmy ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkajo ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkajtaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkajtej ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaju ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkajće ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkali ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkam ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkamoj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkamy ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkana ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkane ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaneho ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanej ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaneje ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaneju ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanemu ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkani ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanja ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanjach ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanjam ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanje ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanjemi ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanjom ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanjomaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanjow ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanju ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanoh ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanom ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanu ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkany ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanych ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanym ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanymaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkanymi ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkataj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkatej ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkać ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaće ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkał ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkała ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkałe ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkało ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkałoj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaš ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaše ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaštaj ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkaštej ...
SFX 0527 rka njerkašće ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaca ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkace ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaceho ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacej ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaceje ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaceju ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacemu ...
SFX 0527 rka rkach ...
SFX 0527 rka rkachmoj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkachmy ...
SFX 0527 rka rkachu ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacoh ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacom ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacu ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacy ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacych ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacym ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacymaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkacymi ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaja ...
SFX 0527 rka rkajmoj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkajmy ...
SFX 0527 rka rkajo ...
SFX 0527 rka rkajtaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkajtej ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaju ...
SFX 0527 rka rkajće ...
SFX 0527 rka rkali ...
SFX 0527 rka rkam ...
SFX 0527 rka rkamoj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkamy ...
SFX 0527 rka rkana ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkane ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaneho ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanej ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaneje ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaneju ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanemu ...
SFX 0527 rka rkani ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanja ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanjach ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanjam ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanje ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanjemi ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanjom ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanjomaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanjow ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanju ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanoh ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanom ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanu ...
SFX 0527 rka rkany ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanych ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanym ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanymaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkanymi ...
SFX 0527 rka rkataj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkatej ...
SFX 0527 rka rkać ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaće ...
SFX 0527 rka rkał ...
SFX 0527 rka rkała ...
SFX 0527 rka rkałe ...
SFX 0527 rka rkało ...
SFX 0527 rka rkałoj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaš ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaše ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaštaj ...
SFX 0527 rka rkaštej ...
SFX 0527 rka rkašće ...

SFX 0528 Y 151
SFX 0528 s njes .
SFX 0528 s njese .
SFX 0528 s njesech .
SFX 0528 s njesechmoj .
SFX 0528 s njesechmy .
SFX 0528 s njesechu .
SFX 0528 s njesemoj .
SFX 0528 s njesemy .
SFX 0528 s njesena .
SFX 0528 s njesenaj .
SFX 0528 s njesene .
SFX 0528 s njeseneho .
SFX 0528 s njesenej .
SFX 0528 s njeseneje .
SFX 0528 s njeseneju .
SFX 0528 s njesenemu .
SFX 0528 s njeseni .
SFX 0528 s njesenja .
SFX 0528 s njesenjach .
SFX 0528 s njesenjam .
SFX 0528 s njesenje .
SFX 0528 s njesenjemi .
SFX 0528 s njesenjom .
SFX 0528 s njesenjomaj .
SFX 0528 s njesenjow .
SFX 0528 s njesenju .
SFX 0528 s njesenoh .
SFX 0528 s njesenom .
SFX 0528 s njesenu .
SFX 0528 s njeseny .
SFX 0528 s njesenych .
SFX 0528 s njesenym .
SFX 0528 s njesenymaj .
SFX 0528 s njesenymi .
SFX 0528 s njesetaj .
SFX 0528 s njesetej .
SFX 0528 s njeseće .
SFX 0528 s njeseš .
SFX 0528 s njeseše .
SFX 0528 s njeseštaj .
SFX 0528 s njeseštej .
SFX 0528 s njesešće .
SFX 0528 s njesli .
SFX 0528 s njesmoj .
SFX 0528 s njesmy .
SFX 0528 s njeso .
SFX 0528 s njestaj .
SFX 0528 s njestej .
SFX 0528 s njesu .
SFX 0528 s njesuca .
SFX 0528 s njesucaj .
SFX 0528 s njesuce .
SFX 0528 s njesuceho .
SFX 0528 s njesucej .
SFX 0528 s njesuceje .
SFX 0528 s njesuceju .
SFX 0528 s njesucemu .
SFX 0528 s njesucoh .
SFX 0528 s njesucom .
SFX 0528 s njesucu .
SFX 0528 s njesucy .
SFX 0528 s njesucych .
SFX 0528 s njesucym .
SFX 0528 s njesucymaj .
SFX 0528 s njesucymi .
SFX 0528 s njesć .
SFX 0528 s njesće .
SFX 0528 s njesł .
SFX 0528 s njesła .
SFX 0528 s njesłe .
SFX 0528 s njesło .
SFX 0528 s njesłoj .
SFX 0528 s ponjese .
SFX 0528 s ponjesemoj .
SFX 0528 s ponjesemy .
SFX 0528 s ponjesetaj .
SFX 0528 s ponjesetej .
SFX 0528 s ponjeseće .
SFX 0528 s ponjeseš .
SFX 0528 s ponjesu .
SFX 0528 s se .
SFX 0528 s sech .
SFX 0528 s sechmoj .
SFX 0528 s sechmy .
SFX 0528 s sechu .
SFX 0528 s semoj .
SFX 0528 s semy .
SFX 0528 s sena .
SFX 0528 s senaj .
SFX 0528 s sene .
SFX 0528 s seneho .
SFX 0528 s senej .
SFX 0528 s seneje .
SFX 0528 s seneju .
SFX 0528 s senemu .
SFX 0528 s seni .
SFX 0528 s senja .
SFX 0528 s senjach .
SFX 0528 s senjam .
SFX 0528 s senje .
SFX 0528 s senjemi .
SFX 0528 s senjom .
SFX 0528 s senjomaj .
SFX 0528 s senjow .
SFX 0528 s senju .
SFX 0528 s senoh .
SFX 0528 s senom .
SFX 0528 s senu .
SFX 0528 s seny .
SFX 0528 s senych .
SFX 0528 s senym .
SFX 0528 s senymaj .
SFX 0528 s senymi .
SFX 0528 s setaj .
SFX 0528 s setej .
SFX 0528 s seće .
SFX 0528 s seš .
SFX 0528 s seše .
SFX 0528 s seštaj .
SFX 0528 s seštej .
SFX 0528 s sešće .
SFX 0528 s sli .
SFX 0528 s smoj .
SFX 0528 s smy .
SFX 0528 s so .
SFX 0528 s staj .
SFX 0528 s stej .
SFX 0528 s su .
SFX 0528 s suca .
SFX 0528 s sucaj .
SFX 0528 s suce .
SFX 0528 s suceho .
SFX 0528 s sucej .
SFX 0528 s suceje .
SFX 0528 s suceju .
SFX 0528 s sucemu .
SFX 0528 s sucoh .
SFX 0528 s sucom .
SFX 0528 s sucu .
SFX 0528 s sucy .
SFX 0528 s sucych .
SFX 0528 s sucym .
SFX 0528 s sucymaj .
SFX 0528 s sucymi .
SFX 0528 s sć .
SFX 0528 s sće .
SFX 0528 s sł .
SFX 0528 s sła .
SFX 0528 s słe .
SFX 0528 s sło .
SFX 0528 s słoj .

SFX 0529 Y 7
SFX 0529 e emoj .
SFX 0529 e emy .
SFX 0529 e etaj .
SFX 0529 e etej .
SFX 0529 e eće .
SFX 0529 e eš .
SFX 0529 e u .
